Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.241

Capping of milk or milk products.

Capping of milk or milk products shall be done in a sanitary manner by means of approved equipment and operations. The cap or cover shall cover the pouring lip to at least its largest diameter.

[ 2005 c 414 s 3; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.420. Prior: 1955 c 238 s 64; prior: 1949 c 168 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-36, part. Formerly RCW 15.36.420.]